Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2245.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of a gun safe or gun lock. For the purposes of this clause, the following terms and phrases shall have the following meanings:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Gun lock" shall have the same meaning as the term "locking device" as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6142(f) (relating to locking device for firearms)."Gun safe" means a self-contained enclosure specifically designed and manufactured for the purpose of securely storing a firearm and equipped with a padlock, key lock, combination lock, keypad, electronic keypad, biometric scanner or similar mechanism that, when properly locked, prevents unauthorized access to the firearm. The term does not include a gun cabinet.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2245PN3446 - 2 - 12345678910